California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(D) (i) For each eligible hospital that meets the definition of a public hospital as of July 1 of the applicable payment adjustment year, the hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount shall be multiplied by a “public hospital adjustment factor.” The applicable adjustment factor
 shall be derived as follows:

(I) The tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amounts determined under paragraph (3) for each public hospital described above shall be added together.

(II) The amount identified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) shall be reduced by the sums of the amounts determined for all nonpublic-converted hospitals under clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) and all converted hospitals under clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) and the sum of the amounts determined for all nonpublic hospitals under clause (ii) of subparagraph (C).

(III) The applicable adjustment factor shall be that ratio that results from dividing the amount derived in subclause (II) by the amount derived in subclause (I).

(ii) The resulting product shall be
 the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for the hospital for the period October 1 through June 30 of the applicable payment adjustment year, which shall be paid to the hospital in accordance with paragraph (5). Notwithstanding the foregoing, however, in no case shall the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount exceed the hospital’s OBRA 1993 payment limitation, and, where that would otherwise occur, the remaining amount that would have been allocated to the particular hospital shall be reallocated to all other public hospitals that have not reached their OBRA 1993 payment limitation on a pro rata basis so that the aggregate sum of the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amounts for all public hospitals equals the amount derived in subclause (II) of clause (i).

(5) (A) The final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount determined for each eligible hospital for
 the period October 1 through June 30 of the applicable payment adjustment year shall be distributed to the hospital in 8 equal installments, each payable as of the last day of each month from October through May of the applicable payment adjustment year. However, no hospital shall receive an installment for any month in which the hospital does not remain in operation for the entire month.

(B) To the extent that any hospital of either of the hospital types described in subparagraph (C) or (D) of paragraph (4) is not entitled to receive an installment that otherwise would be payable but for the hospital’s failure to remain in operation through the last day of a particular month, the amount that would have been paid to the hospital shall be redistributed among those hospitals of the same hospital type that remain in operation from October 1 through June 30 of the applicable payment adjustment year, to be distributed on a pro rata basis. The
 redistributed amounts shall be payable as of June 30 of the applicable payment adjustment year.

(6) If, with respect to the 2001–02 payment adjustment year or any subsequent payment adjustment year, the amount identified for California for the applicable federal fiscal year pursuant to Section 1396r-4(f) of Title 42 of the United States Code exceeds the amount of eight hundred seventy-seven million dollars ($877,000,000), the department shall implement the provisions of paragraphs (1) through (5) with respect to the applicable payment adjustment year as modified below.

(A) The department shall determine the maximum state disproportionate share hospital allotment for California under the provisions of applicable federal medicaid rules.

(B) The department shall calculate the maximum state disproportionate share
 hospital allotment for California, by substituting in the calculation the amount of eight hundred seventy-seven million dollars ($877,000,000), as though that amount was identified for California for the applicable federal fiscal year pursuant to Section 1396r-4(f) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(C) The amount determined under subparagraph (B) shall be subtracted from the amount determined under subparagraph (A).

(D) For purposes of the calculations set forth in paragraph (3) regarding each hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount, the initial amount as set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) shall, in each instance prior to its application in those calculations, be increased by the amount derived in subparagraph (C).

(E) The difference derived in subparagraph (C) shall
 be divided by the amount determined in subparagraph (B).

(F) For purposes of the determination made under clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) regarding nonpublic-converted hospitals that also meet the definition of a major teaching hospital, the amount of thirty-five million eight hundred thousand dollars ($35,800,000) as specified therein shall be multiplied by a number equal to the sum of the fraction derived in subparagraph (E) plus the number 1.00.

(G) The fraction derived in subparagraph (E) shall be multiplied by 1.226, and the result thereof added to 1.00, yielding a factor for purposes of modifying the determination of the applicable nonpublic hospital adjustment factor pursuant to subparagraphs (H) and (I).

(H) The amount determined under subclause (II) of clause (i) of subparagraph (C) of
 paragraph (4) shall be multiplied by the factor derived in subparagraph (G), and the resulting amount shall be used for purposes of the calculations set forth in subclause (III) of clause (i) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4), as modified by subparagraph (I) below.

(I) For purposes of the calculations in subclause (III) of clause (i) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4), the recalculated maximum amount derived in subparagraph (B) shall be used in lieu of the maximum amount determined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2).

(J) For purposes of the calculations set forth in subclause (II) of clause (i) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (4) regarding the determination of the applicable public hospital adjustment factor, the initial amount as set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) shall, in each instance prior to its application in those calculations, be increased by the
 amount derived in subparagraph (C).

(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the entire payment adjustment year, no eligible hospital shall receive total payment adjustments in excess of the hospital’s OBRA 1993 payment limitation as computed by the department pursuant to the Medi-Cal State Plan.

(8) The aggregate sum of the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amounts computed under paragraph (4) for each eligible hospital for the period October 1 through June 30 of the applicable payment adjustment year, shall be the maximum size of the payment adjustment program for the entire payment adjustment year, exclusive of the supplemental payment adjustments provided for under subdivision (an).

(9) The department shall implement this subdivision only to the extent consistent with federal medicaid
 law and the Medi-Cal State Plan, and only to the extent that the department determines that federal financial participation is available.

(an) (1) For the 2001–02 payment adjustment year and subsequent payment adjustment years, eligible hospitals that meet the requirements of this subdivision and that are in operation as of June 30 of the applicable payment adjustment year, shall be eligible to receive a supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment, which shall be payable as a result of the facility being a disproportionate share hospital in operation as of that date, but only if the hospital has remained in operation for the period October 1 through June 30 of the applicable payment adjustment year.

(2) The availability of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under this subdivision shall be determined as follows:

(A) The maximum state disproportionate share hospital allotment for California under the provisions of applicable federal medicaid rules shall be identified for the applicable federal fiscal year.

(B) The total amount of all payment adjustment amounts under this section, exclusive of any payments under this subdivision, applicable to the applicable federal fiscal year, whether paid or payable, shall be determined. The applicability of payment adjustment amounts to the 2000 federal fiscal year shall be determined in accordance with federal medicaid rules.

(C) The figure determined under subparagraph (B) shall be subtracted from the figure identified under subparagraph (A). If the remainder is a positive figure, supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments shall be made under this subdivision in accordance with this
 subparagraph and paragraph (3). The positive remainder so derived shall be the maximum amount of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under this subdivision for the applicable payment adjustment year.

(3) (A) For purposes of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under this subdivision, only hospitals that can be categorized into either of the two groups specified in clauses (i) and (ii) below shall be eligible to receive the supplemental payment adjustments, and no hospital may qualify for more than one of the two groups. The following groups of hospitals shall be recognized:

(i) “Public hospitals,” which shall include all eligible hospitals that, as of July 1 of the applicable payment adjustment year, met the definition of a public hospital.

(ii) “Nonpublic hospitals,” which shall
 include all eligible hospitals that, as of July 1 of the applicable payment adjustment year, met the definition of a nonpublic hospital.

(B) The amount determined to be the maximum amount of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) shall first be allocated between the two groups of hospitals referred to in subparagraph (A) as follows:

(i) “Public hospitals”: 75 percent of the maximum amount.

(ii) “Nonpublic hospitals”: 25 percent of the maximum amount.

(C) The amount of funds allocated pursuant to subparagraph (B) to each of the particular groups of hospitals referred to in subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall then be distributed as supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments among the eligible hospitals within each
 particular group as follows:

(i) The department shall identify for each eligible hospital the total amount of payment adjustments under this section, exclusive of any payments under this subdivision, applicable to the payment adjustment year, whether paid or payable. The applicability of the payment adjustment amounts to this period of time shall be determined in accordance with federal medicaid rules.

(ii) The amount identified for each hospital under clause (i) shall be compared to the OBRA 1993 payment limitation that, in accordance with applicable provisions of the Medi-Cal State Plan, the department has computed for the particular hospital for the applicable payment adjustment year.

(iii) Where the amount computed under clause (i) for the particular hospital is equal to or exceeds the OBRA 1993 payment
 limitation for the hospital, the hospital shall not receive a supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment. Data regarding hospitals that have reached this limitation shall not be used for purposes of clauses (v) through (viii).

(iv) Where the amount computed under clause (i) for the particular hospital is less than the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, the amount computed under clause (i) shall be used for purposes of clauses (v) through (viii).

(v) The figures determined under clause (iv) for each hospital in the particular group shall be added together to determine an aggregate total for each group.

(vi) The figures determined for each hospital under clause (iv) shall be divided by the aggregate total determined under clause (v) for the particular group, yielding a percentage figure for each hospital.

(vii) The percentage figure determined for each hospital under clause (vi) shall be applied to the maximum portion of the funds allocated to the particular group under subparagraph (B), to determine the hospital’s pro rata share of the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments. Notwithstanding the foregoing, however, in the case of a nonpublic hospital that, as of July 1 of the applicable payment adjustment year, met the definition of a children’s hospital, that pro rata share otherwise determined shall be multiplied by a factor of 1.69, yielding a modified pro rata share to be applied only with respect to the first one million dollars ($1,000,000) of the funds allocated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (B), and, with respect to the remainder of the funds so allocated, the pro rata share otherwise determined shall be multiplied by a factor of 1.09, yielding a modified pro rata share to be applied. The pro rata share for the other nonpublic
 hospitals shall be reduced accordingly, yielding a modified pro rata share, so that the maximum portion of the funds allocated to the nonpublic hospitals group will not be exceeded. The pro rata share or modified pro rata share, as applicable, for each hospital, as computed under this clause, shall also be used for all purposes relating to descending pro rata distributions under clause (viii).

(viii) In no event shall a hospital receive supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment amounts in excess of the difference between the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital and the amount computed for the hospital under clause (i). Any supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment amount, or portion thereof, that otherwise would have been payable under this paragraph to a hospital, but that is barred by this limitation, shall be distributed on a descending pro rata basis to those hospitals within the same group.

(D) The department shall make interim and final payments of the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments to hospitals on June 30 of the applicable payment adjustment year.

(4) The department shall implement this subdivision only to the extent consistent with federal medicaid law and the Medi-Cal State Plan, and only to the extent that the department determines that federal financial participation is available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 48, Sec. 1.   Effective June 29, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.982.

(a) (1) The department may adopt emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code to specify a process for the preparation and issuance of any or all of the following:

(A) The tentative listing, as that term is used in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 14105.98.

(B) The disproportionate
 share list, as that term is used in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 14105.98.

(C) Hospital-specific payment determinations pursuant to Section 14105.98.

(2) The process may include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Identification of the particular information to be prepared and issued.

(B) The opportunity for an affected hospital to review its individual hospital data elements.

(C) The timeframes for issuance and review of the items described in paragraph (1).

(D) The circumstances under which updated or corrected data may be accepted and used by the department.

(b) The initial adoption of the emergency regulations and one readoption of the initial regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. The initial emergency regulations and the first readoption of those regulations shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and publication in the California Code of Regulations, and shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days. Before adopting any emergency regulations pursuant to this section, the department shall seek input from representatives of the hospital industry, including, but not limited to, the California Healthcare Association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 48, Sec. 2.   Effective June 29, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.985.

(a) (1) Disproportionate share payment augmentation programs shall be maintained for eligible providers pursuant to Section 14087.5, 14088, 14089, 14093, or 14200.

(2) The department shall make payment augmentations directly to eligible providers.

(b) (1) Inpatient days provided by licensed hospitals to Medi-Cal beneficiaries under contract to managed care
 contractors who are contracting with the department under Section 14087.5, 14088, 14093, 14200, or 14490 shall be included in the department’s calculation of annualized Medi-Cal inpatient paid days for use in determining the hospital’s medicaid inpatient hospitalization rate under Section 14105.98.

(2) Managed care contractors subject to paragraph (1) shall report inpatient days subject to paragraph (1) to the department.

(c) Revenue for inpatient services provided for Medi-Cal beneficiaries received by hospitals under contract to managed care contractors who are contracting with the department under Section 14087.5, 14088, 14093, 14200, or 14490 shall be included in the percentage rate calculations for the determination of the low-income utilization rate under Section 14105.98.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 107.5.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.986.

(a) Any children’s hospital as defined in Section 10727 that holds a consolidated license issued pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 1250.8 of the Health and Safety Code may be evaluated for eligibility for payments under subdivision (c) of Section 14105.98 no earlier than January 1, 2000, using data related to all physical plants appearing on the consolidated license. For purposes of calculating the appropriate amount of the payment adjustment under subdivision (l) of Section 14105.98 for these
 children’s hospitals, the department shall use data relating only to the children’s hospital or any other physical plant appearing on the consolidated license which is not more than 15 miles from the children’s hospital and shall exclude data relating to any physical plant added to the consolidated license pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 1250.8 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) The department shall not implement this section unless all of the following occur:

(1) Federal financial participation is available.

(2) The federal Health Care Financing Administration approves a state plan amendment to implement this section.

(3) All data necessary to complete the evaluations and calculations required by subdivision
 (a) are provided to the department from the same sources described in Section 14105.98 and in the approved state plan existing on July 1, 1998. In no event shall data directly provided by a children’s hospital be utilized for these evaluations and calculations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 982, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.99.

(a) For purposes of this section, “Attachment 4.19-A” means the Medi-Cal payment adjustment system for acute inpatient hospital services set forth in Attachment 4.19-A of the Medi-Cal State Plan which became effective on or about July 1, 1990. 

(b) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the annual appropriation for, and distribution of, payments pursuant to Attachment 4.19-A shall be reduced as a result of the payment adjustment program set forth in Section 14105.98, but only when federal approval, as described
 in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 14105.98, is gained for that payment adjustment program. 

(2) When the payment adjustment program set forth in Section 14105.98 gains federal approval, Attachment 4.19-A shall become inoperative and any appropriated amount for Attachment 4.19-A that is unexpended shall revert to the Health Care Deposit Fund for use in support of the Medi-Cal program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1046, Sec. 4.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

14106.

If a Medi-Cal provider negotiates a rate of payment for inpatient, outpatient, or ancillary services with a prepaid health plan under contract with the department pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of this part which is lower than or equal to the lesser of reasonable costs, customary charges, or the schedule of maximum allowances, the rate shall not affect the director’s determination of reasonable costs, customary charges, or schedule of maximum allowances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 328, Sec. 27.   Effective June 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

14106.2.

Insofar as permitted by federal law, for purposes of determining the reasonable costs of any service reimbursable under the provisions of this chapter, or determining prospective per capita rates of payment or cost-basis reimbursement under Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) or Chapter 8.7 (commencing with Section 14520), any gifts, grants, or endowments received by the provider of such services or prepaid health plan, and any income earned by the investment or deposit thereof, shall not be deducted from the operating costs of such provider or plan.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this
 section, to encourage philanthropic support of health facilities and other providers of services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 887, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14106.6.

The director shall establish and update annually a rate schedule of reimbursement for paramedic services which provides reimbursement based upon reasonable cost standards of the department.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and to the extent federal financial participation is available, any city, county, or special district providing paramedic services as set forth in subdivision (s) of Section 14132, shall reimburse the Health Care Deposit Fund for the state costs of paying such medical claims. Funds allocated to the county from the County Health Services Fund pursuant to
 Part 4.5 (commencing with Section 16700) of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code may be utilized by the county or city to make such reimbursement. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require a city, county, or special district providing, or contracting for, paramedic services as part of a program established under Article 3 (commencing with Section 1480) of Chapter 2.5 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, to seek Medi-Cal reimbursement for services rendered to eligible Medi-Cal recipients.

This section shall be in effect only to the extent federal financial participation is available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1322, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

14107.

(a) Any person, including any applicant or provider as defined in Section 14043.1, or billing agent, as defined in Section 14040.1, who engages in any of the activities identified in subdivision (b) is punishable by imprisonment as set forth in subdivisions (c) , (d), and (e), by a fine not exceeding three times the amount of the fraud or improper reimbursement or value of the scheme or artifice, or by both this fine and imprisonment.

(b) The following activities are subject
 to subdivision (a):

(1) A person, with intent to defraud, presents for allowance or payment any false or fraudulent claim for furnishing services or merchandise under this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200).

(2) A person knowingly submits false information for the purpose of obtaining greater compensation than that to which he or she is legally entitled for furnishing services or merchandise under this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200).

(3) A person knowingly submits false information for the purpose of obtaining authorization for furnishing services or merchandise under this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200).

(4) A person knowingly and willfully executes, or attempts to execute, a scheme or
 artifice to do either of the following:

(A) Defraud the Medi-Cal program or any other health care program administered by the department or its agents or contractors.

(B) Obtain, by means of false or fraudulent pretenses, representations, or promises, any of the money or property owned by, or under the custody or control of, the Medi-Cal program or any other health care program administered by the department or its agents or contractors, in connection with the delivery of or payment for health care benefits, services, goods, supplies, or merchandise.

(c) A violation of subdivision (a) is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail, or in the state prison for two, three, or five years.

(d) If the execution of a scheme or artifice to defraud as defined in
 paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) is committed under circumstances likely to cause or that do cause two or more persons great bodily injury, as defined in Section 12022.7 of the Penal Code, or serious bodily injury, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) of Section 243 of the Penal Code, a term of four years, in addition and consecutive to the term of imprisonment imposed in subdivision (c), shall be imposed for each person who suffers great bodily injury or serious bodily injury.

The additional terms provided in this subdivision shall not be imposed unless the facts showing the circumstances that were likely to cause or that did cause great bodily injury or serious bodily injury to two or more persons are charged in the accusatory pleading and admitted or found to be true by the trier of fact.

(e) If the execution of a scheme or artifice to defraud, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision
 (b) results in a death which constitutes a second degree murder, as defined in Section 189 of the Penal Code, the offense shall be punishable, upon conviction, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 190 of the Penal Code.

(f) Any person, including an applicant or provider as defined in Section 14043.1, or billing agent, as defined in Section 14040.1, who has engaged in any of the activities subject to fine or imprisonment under this section, shall be subject to the asset forfeiture provisions for criminal profiteering.

(g) Pursuant to Section 923 of the Penal Code, the Attorney General may convene a grand jury to investigate and indict for any of the activities subject to fine, imprisonment, or asset forfeiture under this section.

(h) The enforcement remedies provided under this section are not exclusive and shall
 not preclude the use of any other criminal or civil remedy. However, an act or omission punishable in different ways by this section and other provisions of law shall not be punished under more than one provision, but the penalty to be imposed shall be determined as set forth in Section 654 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 322, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14107.1.

Any provider on whose behalf improper claims are submitted for authorization or payment under this chapter may be required to submit all such claims over the provider’s own signature for whatever time period the department determines appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 965.)
-------------------------------------------

14107.11.

(a) Upon verification of a credible allegation of fraud by the state, as defined in subdivision (d) and for which an investigation is pending under the Medi-Cal program against a provider as defined in Section 14043.1, or the commencement of a suspension under Section 14123, the provider shall be temporarily placed under payment suspension, unless it is determined there is a good cause exception, as defined in subdivision (g), not to suspend the payments or to suspend them only in part, and the department may do any of
 the following:

(1) Collect any Medi-Cal program overpayment identified through an audit or examination, or any portion thereof from any provider. Notwithstanding Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code, a provider may appeal the collection of overpayments under this section pursuant to procedures established in Article 5.3 (commencing with Section 14170). Overpayments collected under this section shall not be returned to the provider during the pendency of any appeal and may be offset to satisfy audit or appeal findings if the findings are against the provider. Overpayments will be returned to a provider with interest if findings are in favor of the provider.

(2) Give notification of the payment suspension for any goods, services, supplies, or merchandise, or any portion thereof. The department shall notify the provider within five days of any payment suspension under this
 section. The department may delay notification to the provider by 30 days if it is requested to do so in writing by any law enforcement agency, which may be renewed in writing up to two times and in no event may exceed 90 days. The notice to the provider shall do all of the following:

(A) State that the payment suspension is being imposed in accordance with this subdivision and that the payment suspension is for a temporary period and will not continue if it is determined that no credible allegation of fraud remains against the provider or when legal proceedings relating to the allegation are complete.

(B) Cite the circumstances under which the payment suspension will be terminated.

(C) Specify, when appropriate, the type or types of claims for which payment is being suspended.

(D) Inform the provider of the right to submit written evidence that would be admissible under the administrative adjudication provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, for consideration by the department.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code, a provider may appeal a payment suspension pursuant to Section 14043.65. Payments suspended under this section shall not be returned to the provider during the pendency of any appeal and may be offset to satisfy audit or appeal findings.

(c) A payment suspension may be lifted when a resolution of an investigation for fraud or abuse occurs as defined in subdivision (p) of Section 14043.1.

(d) A credible allegation of fraud has the same meaning as set forth in Section 455.2 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(e) (1) On a quarterly basis, the Department of Justice, and any other law enforcement agency that has accepted referrals for investigation from the department, shall submit a report to the department listing
 each referral and stating whether the referral continues to be under investigation and whether it involves a credible allegation of fraud. If the Department of Justice or a law enforcement agency fails to submit a report under this subdivision, the department may request the report from the Department of Justice or the law enforcement agency on no more than a quarterly basis. The Department of Justice or the law enforcement agency, as applicable, shall provide the report within 30 days of the request.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), no quarterly report shall be required from a law enforcement agency, unless that law enforcement agency has either received a referral from the department or reported an open case to the department and has not yet reported rejection or closure of that referral or open case.

(f) A report, request, or notification submitted under this section shall be
 exempt from the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code). These records may be disclosed to law enforcement agencies or other government entities that execute an agreement conforming to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 7921.505 of the Government Code.

(g) For purposes of this section, all of the following apply:

(1) “Provider” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 14043.1.

(2) “Good cause exception” means a reason determined by the department that falls under Section 455.23(e) or (f) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) “Law enforcement agency” includes any agency employing peace officers, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section
 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(h) The director may, in consultation with interested parties, adopt regulations to implement this section as necessary. These regulations may be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and the adoption of the regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. The director shall transmit these emergency regulations directly to the Secretary of State for filing and the regulations shall become effective immediately upon filing. Upon completion of the formal regulation adoption process and prior to the expiration of the 120-day duration period of emergency regulations, the director shall transmit directly to the Secretary of State the adopted regulations,
 the rulemaking file, and the certification of compliance as required by subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 252, Sec. 25.   (AB 173)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14107.115.

(a) The Medi-Cal Anti-Fraud Special Deposit Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(b) All outstanding Medi-Cal payments intercepted by the State Controller’s Office at the direction of the department, as a result of a payment suspension imposed on a Medi-Cal provider pursuant to Section 14107.11, shall be deposited into the Medi-Cal Anti-Fraud Special Deposit Fund.

(c) All moneys deposited into the Medi-Cal Anti-Fraud Special Deposit Fund shall be continuously appropriated and allocated in accordance with subdivision (d), but shall remain in the fund until the department lifts the suspension pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14107.11.

(d) Upon the lifting of a suspension, the department may return the intercepted Medi-Cal payments to the Medi-Cal provider or may offset the payments against any liabilities or restitution owed by the Medi-Cal provider to the department, including, but not limited to, any liabilities described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 14107.11.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 98.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14107.12.

(a) The Department of Justice may pay, pursuant to subdivision (d), from funds recovered by the Department of Justice, and only to the extent that the money may be used for this purpose, a reward to any person who furnishes information leading to the recovery of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) of public funds paid for services or goods rendered under the Medi-Cal program due to an act or omission by an individual or entity from which recovery is sought and that is the basis of a conviction of a Medi-Cal provider of services or goods in violation of any statutory criminal prohibition within the jurisdiction of the
 Division of Medi-Cal Fraud and Elder Abuse pursuant to Section 12528 of the Government Code.

(b) A reward shall not be paid for information under this section unless the information relates to the specific activities of a specific individual or entity, and specifies the time period during which the prohibited activities occurred.

(c) A reward shall not be paid under this section to a federal, state, or local public employee or any individual contracting with a state or local agency for information discovered by the employee during the course of their duties as a federal, state, or local agency employee or pursuant to a contract with that agency.

(d) The amount of a reward under this section shall be determined
 by the Department of Justice, and shall not exceed 10 percent of the restitution recovered or one thousand dollars ($1,000), whichever is less. A reward shall not be paid until all recoverable funds have been collected from the individual or entity convicted of a violation of statutory prohibitions listed in subdivision (a).

(e) A determination by the Department of Justice of the eligibility of an individual to receive a reward, the amount and appropriateness of a reward under this section, and the timing of the payment of the reward shall be deemed to be final and shall not be subject to administrative appeal or judicial review.

(f) Subject to subdivision (g), payments made under authority of this section shall be disregarded for purposes of determining eligibility for any
 Medi-Cal program, the CalWORKs program, the CalFresh program, the County Medical Services Program, and any other means-tested public benefit program for which California has authority to establish the rules for determining eligibility.

(g) The income disregard described in subdivision (f) shall not be effective, with respect to an identified program, until the first day of the third month from the month in which any necessary federal approval is obtained. The income disregard provided for in subdivision (f) shall only be implemented to the extent that federal financial participation is obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 554, Sec. 11.   (SB 823)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14107.13.

(a) (1) The department, in conjunction with the Department of Justice, shall identify those areas of the fee-for-service Medi-Cal program that are at greatest risk of fraud or abuse.

(2) In an effort to curb the fraud and abuse, the department shall do one or both of the following:

(A) Request confirmation of service from beneficiaries that services or goods were actually received.

(B) Request confirmation of service from referring and rendering providers that the referring providers actually authorized and the rendering providers actually delivered services or goods underlying claims for reimbursement.

(3) For purposes of this section, “areas” includes, but is not limited to, provider types, services, aid code categories, and geographic areas.

(b) For any fee-for-service benefit, the department shall provide a notice to confirm service to the following:

(1) The recipient of the benefits.

(A) Notices under this paragraph shall be provided no more frequently than once per calendar month and shall detail all benefits reportedly received that are relevant to the suspected
 fraudulent or abusive activity identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a notice shall not be provided to a beneficiary who has not received benefits that are relevant to the suspected fraudulent or abusive activity identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(2) The referring and rendering providers of benefits.

(A) Notices under this paragraph shall be provided no more frequently than one per calendar month and shall detail all referrals for benefits and all benefits rendered that are relevant to the suspected fraudulent or abusive activity identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).
